Washington statutes.
RCW 35.49.140

Tax liens—Payment by city after taking property on foreclosure of local assessments.

If a city or town has bid in any property on sale for local improvement assessments, it may satisfy the lien of any outstanding general taxes upon the property by payment of the face of such taxes and costs, without penalty or interest, but this shall not apply where certificates of delinquency against the property have been issued to private persons.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.49.140. Prior: 1929 c 143 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 170 s 1, part; 1911 c 98 s 40, part; RRS s 9393, part.]